Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

For contingent expiration of this chapter, see Section 8208.003.

CHAPTER 8208. FOUR SEASONS RANCH MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT NO. 1 OF DENTON COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8208.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Four Seasons Ranch Municipal Utility District No. 1 of Denton County.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4069), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 8208.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a municipal utility district in Denton County created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4069), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 8208.003. CONFIRMATION ELECTION REQUIRED. If the creation of the district is not confirmed at a confirmation election held under Section 8208.024 before September 1, 2011:

(1) the district is dissolved September 1, 2011, except that the district shall:

(A) pay any debts incurred;

(B) transfer to Denton County any assets that remain after the payment of debts; and

(C) maintain the organization of the district until all debts are paid and remaining assets are transferred; and

(2) this chapter expires September 1, 2014.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4069), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 8208.004. INITIAL DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is initially composed of the territory described by Section 9.02 of the article creating this chapter.

(b) The boundaries and field notes contained in Section 9.02 of the article creating this chapter form a closure. A mistake made in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect:

(1) the organization, existence, or validity of the district;

(2) the right of the district to impose taxes;

(3) the validity of the district's bonds, notes, or other indebtedness; or

(4) the legality or operation of the board.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4069), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8208.051. DIRECTORS; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4069), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 8208.052. ELECTION OF DIRECTORS. On the uniform election date in May of each even-numbered year, the appropriate number of directors shall be elected.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4069), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8208.101. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, applicable to municipal utility districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4069), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 8208.102. ROAD PROJECTS. (a) To the extent authorized by Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, the district may construct, acquire, improve, maintain, or operate macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements in aid of those roads, inside the district.

(b) A road project must meet or exceed all applicable construction standards, zoning and subdivision requirements, and regulatory ordinances of each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the district is located.

(c) The district may not undertake a road project unless each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the district is located consents by ordinance or resolution.

(d) The district shall, at its sole cost and expense, maintain, improve, operate, and repair all roads constructed or acquired by the district unless the municipality or county in which a road is located voluntarily assumes the obligation. An assumption of an obligation under this subsection is not valid or binding unless the assumption is in writing, executed by the necessary parties, and filed in the land records of the county in which the road is located.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4069), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 8208.103. COMPLIANCE WITH MUNICIPAL ORDINANCES OR RESOLUTIONS. The district shall comply with all applicable requirements of any ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the district is located.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4069), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 8208.104. ANNEXATION OF LAND IN GRAYSON COUNTY. The district may not annex land located in Grayson County without the prior consent of the Commissioners Court of Grayson County.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4069), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 8208.105. DIVISION OF DISTRICT. (a) The district may be divided into two new districts only if the district:

(1) has no outstanding bonded debt; and

(2) is not imposing ad valorem taxes.

(b) The division procedure is prescribed by Sections 53.030 through 53.041, Water Code.

(c) Any new district created by the division of the district has all the powers and duties of the district.

(d) A new district, at the time it is created by the division of the district, may not contain land outside the area described by Section 9.02 of the article creating this chapter.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4069), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8208.151. TAX TO REPAY BONDS. The district may impose a tax to pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued under Section 8208.201.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4069), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER E. BONDS

Sec. 8208.201. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. (a) The district may issue bonds or other obligations as provided by Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, and to finance the construction, maintenance, or operation of projects under Sections 8208.101 and 8208.102.

(b) The district may not issue bonds to finance projects authorized by Section 8208.102 unless the issuance is approved by a vote of a two-thirds majority of district voters voting at an election called for that purpose.

(c) Bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance projects authorized by Section 8208.102 may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the district.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1129 (H.B. 4069), Sec. 8.01, eff. September 1, 2007.